Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-2250
Certificate of good standing.

The board may, upon payment of the appropriate fee in an amount established by the board pursuant to section 76-2241, issue a certificate of good standing to any credential holder under the Real Property Appraiser Act who is in good standing in this state.

Laws 1990, LB 1153, § 50;

Laws 1991, LB 203, § 54;

Laws 1994, LB 1107, § 47;

Laws 2001, LB 162, § 42;

Laws 2006, LB 778, § 70;

Laws 2015, LB139, § 70.